Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2891.01
Pharmacy technician; validate acts, tasks, and functions of pharmacy technician; policies and procedures.

(1) A pharmacy technician may validate the acts, tasks, and functions of another pharmacy technician only if:

(a) Both pharmacy technicians are certified by a state or national certifying body which is approved by the board;

(b) Both certified pharmacy technicians are working within the confines of a hospital preparing medications for administration in the hospital;

(c) Using bar code technology, radio frequency identification technology, or similar technology to validate the accuracy of medication;

(d) Validating medication that is prepackaged by the manufacturer or prepackaged and verified by a pharmacist; and

(e) Acting in accordance with policies and procedures applicable in the hospital established by the pharmacist in charge.

(2) The pharmacist in charge in a hospital shall establish policies and procedures for validation of medication by two or more certified pharmacy technicians before such validation process is implemented in the hospital.

Laws 2019, LB74, § 5.